Missouri, session 2026, HB2283.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 197, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 197.180, to read as follows:
197.180. 1. Medications in multidose containers that are administered to or used
for a patient during the patient's hospital stay may, if so ordered by an authorized
health care provider, be sent with the patient at discharge to the patient's home or to
another health care facility.
2. Multidose medications shall include, but are not limited to, inhalers,
ointments, creams, medications requiring the original container for dispensing, insulin
pens and vials, eye drops, ear drops, wearable or on-body medication delivery systems,
and infusions that are currently connected to the patient's infusion device.
3. Multidose medications shall be labeled with the date, patient's name,
prescriber's name, name and address of the hospital, medication name and strength,
instructions for use, and other pertinent information. Labeling shall be performed by a
pharmacist, prescriber, or registered nurse. Labeled instructions for use may refer to
specific written instructions provided by a pharmacist, prescriber, or registered nurse at
the time of discharge.
4. Controlled substances shall not be sent with the patient, except that wearable
or on-body medication delivery systems of controlled substances or controlled substance
infusions currently connected to the patient's infusion device may be sent if:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2283 2
(1) The medication is necessary for administration during transport of the
patient;
(2) The quantity of the controlled substance sent is documented in the patient's
medical record by the person sending the medication; and
(3) The pharmacy is notified that the medication is being sent with the patient.
5. This section shall not require a class B hospital pharmacy to obtain or comply
with additional licensure or regulatory requirements.
✔